Washington statutes.
RCW 15.19.090

Violations of chapter or rules—Unlawful.

It is unlawful for a person to sell, offer for sale, hold for sale, or ship or transport American ginseng for foreign export in violation of this chapter or rules adopted under this chapter.

[ 1998 c 154 s 29.]